th: ตำแหน่งที่ตั้งที่เหมาะสม: ระเบียง; ห้องน้ำ; ห้องนอน; ห้องเด็ก; ทางเดินยาว; ลานบ้าน; ห้องรับประทานอาหาร; ทางเข้า; โรงรถ; สวน; โถงทางเดิน; ห้องครัว; ห้องซักรีด; ห้องนั่งเล่น; ลานบ้าน; ชานบ้าน; ห้องเก็บของ; สุขา; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 適用地點: 陽台; 浴室; 臥室; 兒童房; 走廊; 庭院; 餐廳; 入口; 車庫; 花園; 走廊; 廚房; 洗衣房; 客廳; 露臺; 門廊; 儲物室; 洗手間; 其他
lt-LT: Tinkama vieta: Balkonas; Vonios kambarys; Miegamasis; Vaikų kambarys; Koridorius; Kiemas; Valgomasis; Įėjimas; Garažas; Sodas; Prieškambaris; Virtuvė; Skalbykla; Svetainė; Prieangis; Veranda; Sandėliukas; Tualetas; Kita
ro-RO: Locație potrivită: Balcon; Baie; Dormitor; Camera copiilor; Corridor; Curte; Sufragerie; Intrare; Garaj; Grădină; Hol; Bucătărie; Spălătorie; Camera de zi; Curte interioară; Verandă; Debara; Toaletă; Altele
fi: Soveltuu sijaintiin: Parveke; Kylpyhuone; Makuuhuone; Lastenhuone; Käytävä; Piha; Ruokasali; Sisäänkäynti; Autotalli; Puutarha; Eteishalli; Keittiö; Pyykkitupa; Olohuone; Patio; Kuisti; Varasto; WC; Muu
ru: Подходящее помещение: Балкон; Ванная комната; Спальня; Детская; Коридор; Двор; Столовая; Вход; Гараж; Сад; Прихожая; Кухня; Прачечная; Гостиная; Патио; Крыльцо; Кладовая; Туалет; Другое
sk-SK: Vhodné umiestnenie: Balkón; Kúpeľňa; Spálňa; Detská izba; Chodba; Nádvorie; Jedáleň; Vchod; Garáž; Záhrada; Chodba; Kuchyňa; Práčovňa; Obývacia izba; Vnútorná terasa; Veranda; Skladovací priestor; WC; Iné
tr: Uygun Konum: Balkon; Banyo; Yatak odası; Çocuk odası; Koridor; Avlu; Yemek odası; Giriş kapısı; Garaj; Bahçe; Koridor; Mutfak; Çamaşır odası; Yemek odası; Veranda; Sundurma; Depo; Tuvalet; Diğer
pt-PT: Localização adequada: Varanda; Casa de banho; Quarto; Quarto de criança; Corredor; Átrio; Sala de jantar; Entrada; Garagem; Jardim; Hall; Cozinha; Lavandaria; Sala de estar; Pátio; Alpendre; Arrecadação; WC; Outro
de: Geeignete Platzierung: Balkon; Badezimmer; Schlafzimmer; Kinderzimmer; Gang; Hof; Esszimmer; Eingang; Werkstatt; Garten; Flur; Küche; Wäschekammer; Wohnzimmer; Terrasse; Veranda; Lagerraum; Toilette; Sonstiges
cs: Vhodné umístění: Balkón; Koupelna; Ložnice; Dětský pokoj; Chodba; Dvůr; Jídelna; Vchod; Garáž; Zahrada; Chodba; Kuchyně; Prádelna; Obývací pokoj; Patio; Veranda; Komora; Záchod; Jiné
zh-CN: 适用地点: 阳台; 浴室; 卧室; 儿童房间; 走廊; 庭院; 餐厅; 进门区域; 车库; 花园; 门厅; 厨房; 洗衣房; 客厅; 露台; 门廊; 储藏室; 洗手间; 其他
it: Tipo di posizionamento ideale: Balcone; Bagno; Camera da letto; Cameretta; Corridoio; Corte; Sala da pranzo; Entrata; Garage; Giardino; Disimpegno; Cucina; Lavanderia; Soggiorno; Patio; Portico; Ripostiglio; Toilette; Altro
ko: 적합한 위치: 발코니; 화장실; 침실; 어린이방; 복도; 안마당; 식당; 입구; 차고; 정원; 현관; 부엌; 세탁실; 거실; 파티오; 현관; 저장고; 화장실; 기타
vi: Vị trí phù hợp: Ban công; Phòng tắm; Phòng ngủ; Phòng trẻ em; Lối đi; Sân trong; Phòng ăn; Cổng vào; Gara; Vườn; Hành lang; Phòng bếp; Phòng giặt ủi; Phòng khách; Sân hiên; Hiên nhà; Nhà kho; Phòng vệ sinh; Khác
pl: Odpowiednia lokalizacja: Balkon; Łazienka; Sypialnia; Pokój dziecięcy; Korytarz; Dziedziniec; Jadalnia; Wejście; Garaż; Ogród; Sień; Kuchnia; Pralnia; Salon; Patio; Ganek; Pomieszczenie magazynowe; Toaleta; Pozostałe
fr: Emplacement approprié: Balcon; Salle de bain; Chambre à coucher; Chambre des enfants; Corridor; Cour; Salle à manger; Entrée; Garage; Jardin; Couloir; Cuisine; Buanderie; Salle à manger; Patio; Porche; Salle de rangement; Toilettes; Autre
da: Velegnet placering: Balkon; Badeværelse; Soveværelse; Børneværelse; Korridor; Gårdsplads; Spisestue; Bryggers; Garage; Have; Gang; Køkken; Vaskerum; Stue; Gårdhave; Veranda; Opbevaringsrum; Toilet; Andet
es: Ubicación adecuada: Balcón; Cuarto de baño; Dormitorio; Habitación infantil; Pasillo; Patio; Comedor; Entrada; Garaje; Jardín; Pasillo; Cocina; Lavandería; Sala de estar; Patio; Porche; Almacén; Aseo; Otros
sl-SI: Primerna lokacija: Balkon; Kopalnica; Spalnica; Otroška soba; Koridor; Dvorišče; Jedilnica; Vhod; Garaža; Vrt; Hodnik; Kuhinja; Pralnica; Dnevna soba; Terasa; Veranda; Shramba; Stranišče; Drugo
nb: Egnet plassering: Balkong; Baderom; Soverom; Barnerom; Korridor; Gårdsplass; Spisestue; Inngang; Garasje; Hage; Gang; Kjøkken; Vaskerom; Spisestue; Uteplass; Veranda; Lagerrom; Toalett; Annen
ja: 適した場所: バルコニー; 浴室; 寝室; 子供部屋; 廊下; 中庭; ダイニングルーム; 玄関; ガレージ; 庭; 廊下; 台所; 洗濯室; リビングルーム; パティオ; ポーチ; 貯蔵室; トイレ; その他
el: Κατάλληλη τοποθεσία: Μπαλκόνι; Τουαλέτα; Υπνοδωμάτιο; Παιδικό δωμάτιο; Δίδρομος; Αυλή; Τραπεζαρία; Είσοδος; Γκαράζ; Κήπος; Διάδρομος; Κουζίνα; Πλυσταριό; Καθιστικό; Αίθριο; Βεράντα; Αποθήκη; Τουαλέτα; Άλλο
bg-BG: Подходящо местоположение: Балкон; Баня; Спалня; Детска стая; Коридор; Двор; Трапезария; Вход; Гараж; Градина; Вестибюл; Кухня; Перално помещение; Всекидневна; Вътрешен двор; Веранда; Складово помещение; Тоалетна; Други
hr-HR: Prikladna lokacija: Balkon; Kupaonica; Spavaća soba; Dječja soba; Hodnik; Dvorište; Blagovaonica; Ulaz; Garaža; Vrt; Hodnik; Kuhinja; Praonica rublja; Dnevni boravak; Terasa; Trijem; Skladište; Toalet; Ostalo
hu: Megfelelő hely: Erkély; Fürdőszoba; Hálószoba; Gyerekszoba; Folyosó; Udvar; Ebédlő; Bejárat; Garázs; Kert; Előszoba; Konyha; Mosókonyha; Nappali; Terasz; Veranda; Raktárhelyiség; WC; Egyéb
sv: Lämplig plats: Balkong; Badrum; Sovrum; Barnkammare; Korridor; Gård; Matrum; Ingång; Garage; Trädgård; Korridor; Kök; Tvättstuga; Vardagsrum; Uteplats; Veranda; Förråd; Toalett; Annat
pt-BR: Localização adequada: Sacada; Banheiro; Quarto; Quarto infantil; Corredor; Átrio; Sala de jantar; Acesso; Garagem; Jardim; Hall; Cozinha; Lavandaria; Sala de estar; Pátio; Varanda; Despensa; Banheiro; Outro
nl: Geschikte locatie: Balkon; Badkamer; Slaapkamer; Kinderkamer; Corridor; Binnenplaats; Eetkamer; Ingang; Garage; Tuin; Gang; Keuken; Wasruimte; Woonkamer; Patio; Veranda; Opslagruimte; Toilet; Andere
en: Suitable location: Balcony; Bathroom; Bedroom; Children's room; Corridor; Courtyard; Dining room; Entrance; Garage; Garden; Hallway; Kitchen; Laundry room; Living room; Patio; Porch; Storage room; Toilet; Other